patterns/hyph-sk-slabika.tex
% SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2026 Peter Bezemek
% SPDX-License-Identifier: CC0-1.0 OR MIT
% EXPERIMENTAL / WORK IN PROGRESS — not the project's final released patterns.
% Generated from the current slabika engine by tools/liang_experiment.py.
% Engine mode: preferred.
% This reproduces engine output; it is not an independently verified PSP gold set.
% left_hyphen_min = 2, right_hyphen_min = 3
% REUSE-IgnoreStart
\patterns{
.ad3r
.ag3r
.ak3l
.ak3r
.ak3v
.ap3l
.ap3r
.as3t
.at3r
.auto3
.autor4s
.aš1
.bi4dl
.ch4
.divos4t
.dne4
.doch4
.do3p4
.do3s
.dos4p
.do3vn
.doz4
.do3č4
.do3šť
.du3má
.dó1
.dž2
.eh1
.ek3l
.ek3v
.es3p
.es3t
.et3r
.ih3l
.ih3r
.ik3r
.ino3s4t
.is1
.iš1
.jemno3
.kos3tr
.mili3
.mo4kr
.nad3ej
.nad3er
.nad3íď
.na4díďm
.na4díďt
.nah4
.na3m
.nas4
.na3u4
.navrs3
.na3č4
.neb4
.net4
.ne3č4n
.no4p3
.nos3t
.nás3ť4
.ob3ah
.ob3a4lá
.ob3a4lí
.ob3a4n
.ob3a4r
.ob3erm
.obe4rú
.ob3i4j
.ob3im
.oble4dl
.ob3o4d
.obod3u4
.ob3ohr
.ob3om
.obom4kl
.ob3os
.ob3oš
.ob3o4ž
.obu4
.ob3uj
.ob3ul
.ob3z
.ob3á4r
.ob3í4
.ob3ú4v
.och3l
.och3ro
.ode4j
.od3eje
.od3ejm
.od3elo
.od3e4r
.odha4dl
.odi4
.od3ia
.od3is
.od3iz
.odna3
.odnau4
.odo3
.odob4
.odom4
.odop4
.od3opi
.od3orm
.od3ort
.odos4
.od3r
.od3u4j
.od3ul
.od3u4č
.od3z4
.od3ú4
.od3ž4
.of3ra
.of3ľ
.oh3l
.oh3m
.oh3n
.oh3re
.oh3ri
.oh3ry
.oh3rý
.oh3ľ
.ok3l
.ok3m
.ok3r
.ok3v
.om3l
.om3rá
.op3lač
.op3lať
.op3lec
.op3leť
.op3lát
.op3rat
.op3raž
.os3c
.os3lav
.os3laď
.os3lád
.os3m
.os3pi
.os3t
.ot3lá
.ot3rav
.ot3re
.ot3ri
.ot3ru
.ot3rú
.ot3v
.ov3l
.ov3r
.ov3z
.oz3r
.oš3k4
.oš3p
.oš3t
.oš3ľ
.oš3ť
.ož3r
.paci4e
.pod3eď
.po4deďm
.po4deďt
.podh4
.pod3íď
.po4díďm
.po4díďt
.pomk4
.pot3kl
.po3č4k
.pra3cm
.pra3sm
.pra3šť
.pra3žm
.pred3í
.premk4
.pries4v
.pri3h4
.re4b3r
.re3du
.re4hl
.re4k3l
.re4k3r
.re4k3v
.re4pl
.re4p3r
.re4s3p
.re4st
.re4tr
.re4zn
.reš3
.ro4s3t4
.ro4zi
.ro4zopl
.rozp4
.roz3í
.ro4zíďm
.ro4zíďt
.sy4c
.sús4
.súv4
.sú3žm
.uch4r
.uh3ry
.uk3l
.us3k
.us4tro
.ut4ka
.ut4ká
.uzamk4
.vodi4dl
.vozi4
.vo3zm
.vrs3
.vyh4
.vymk4
.vy3t
.vý3s
.všeo4
.yt3r
.za3dn
.zak4
.za3r4d
.zat4
.zav4r
.zoh4na
.zomk4
.zo3pl
.zo3pä
.zos4c
.zos4l
.zo4s3tá
.zo3čm
.zošk4
.zo3ž4
.áš4
.ír4ska
.ír4sku
.ír4sky.
.úh3l
.ús3tra
.ústre4d
.čar3bl
.ši4dl
.žo4b
a1a
aar2
ab4a
4abi
ab3le
ab3lu
ab3lá
ab3ra
abrin4kl
a1by
a1bĺ
ac3erý
ach3má
a3chv
ach4vá
a3chy
a3chý
ac4l
a3co
a1cp
a4d3a4b
a4d3ec
ad3e4je
ad3e4jú
a4d3ek
ade4r
ad3eri
ad3erú
a4d3e4s
a4d3e4š
a4d3ial
a4d3iať
ad3ieľ
ad3l
a4dlam
a4dle
a4dlom
a4dlu
a4d3obl
a4d3o4n
a4d3o4pu
ado4s
ados3l
ad3očn
ad3ral
ad3ran
ad3rať
ad3re
ad3ria
a3drob
ad3rá
ad3rí
a3drú.
a3drž
a1du
adu3m
a4d3u4ž
ad1v
a1dy
adz3n
a4d3á4j
a1dó
a1dô
ad1ľ
ad3že
ad3ži
a1e
ae2h1
aero3s
aes1
af1n
af3ra
af3re
af3ri
af3ro
af2ň
agis3
a2g1n
a3go
ag3ri
ag3rov
ag3ru
a2g1ľ
a1ha
ahap3
a1he2
a1hi
ah3le
ah1n
a1ho
a1hr
a1hu
a1hy
a1há
a1hé
a1hô
a1hú
a1hý
a1hľ
a1ic
a1id
a1ig
aih1
a1ik
a1im
a1in
a1i2o
a1ir
a1is
ai3sk
a1iv
a1iz
a1ič
a4j3a4r
a4j3au
a4j3e4du
aj3id
aj4km
ajo4h
aj3ot
aj3u4d
aju4r
aj3už
a1kd
a1ke
a1ki
ak3loc
ak3lom
ak3lov
ak3ru
aku3ch4
ak3vo
a1ky
a1ké
a1kô
a1kú
a1ký
ak2ň
a1kŕ
a1la
alci3
a1le
3aler
a1li
a1lo
al1s2
a1lu
a1ly
a1lá
a1lí
4alí.
a1lú
a1lý
a1m
ames3
a2mn
am3rá
ana4s3
an4bl
a1ne
ane4sc
ano4g3
an4sc
an4s3oc
aná4st
a3ní
a1o
ao4berať
ao4berá
ao4bi
ao4by
ao4di
aok1
ao2m
aos1
aos4p
ao2u
aov3l
ao2z
a1pe
a1pi
a1po
apo4p3
apo4s3
apot4
apot3r
apo4čne.
apo4čnú.
apo4š
ap3rad
ap3raď
apre4h3
ap3reš
ap3rič
ap3rod
ap3rov
ap3ru
a1py
a1pá
a1pä
a1pô
a1pú
a1pĺ
ap3ľa
a1ra
aras3t
arb2
ar3bne
ar3bni
ar3bnúc
ar1c
a1re
4are.
aredo4
are4hl
are4hn
are4tk
are4š
arg2
a1ri
ari3ac
ark4
ar4mú
ar3n2
a1ro
aroa4
arop3l
aro3z4ná
ar1s2
ar3tn
art4ň
a1ru
a1ry
a1rá
a1ré
a1rí
a1ró
a1rô
a1rú
a1rý
as3ký
asla3
a3sln
as3lá
as2m
a3s4nič
as2p
as3pe
as3pr
as3tal
as3tač
as3tať
as3tia
a4stk
as3tlo
as3tm
as3t4nen
as3tom
a3stone
as3tov
as3tre.
a4sty
as3tín
a1ta
atas3
a2tc
ati4a
atip3
atk2
a4t3ka
a4tke
a4tku
a4tky
a4tká
at3le
at3lú
ato4h3l
a4tose
ato4v3l
at3ren
at3ric
at3ril
at3riť
a3trn
at3ro
at3ru
at3rí
at3ró
a1tu
at3va
at3vi
at3vou
at3vác
at3vám
a1ty
a1tá
a1tí
a1tú
a1tĺ
at1ľ
a1tŕ
auci3
a2ud
a1u2h
2au2j
a4ujme.
au1m
a4uno
aus3
a3usp
aus4po
a4uti
au3tí
au3vi
au3za
a3u4če
a1v
av1d
av4da
a4vk
av3lo
a3v4na
av4niv
a3v4nu
av4ná
av3ret
a2v1s
a2vt
avy4kl
av3za
av3zi
av3zm
av3zí
avýs4
avý4ska.
avý3sko
a4v1š
a3vž
a1x
a1y
a1za
a1z2b
az4da
az3dni.
az3d4nia
az3d4nim
az3d4nit
az3d4niť
a3zdr
a1ze
az4hr
a4zhŕ
a1zi
a4z1m
az4mar
az1n
a1zo
azo4s
a1zr
a1zu
az3vi
az3vá
az3ví
a1zí
az1ľ
a1á
a1é
a1ó
a1ú
aú2r
aú2t
ač3ma
a1ďa
a1ľa
a1ľu
a1ľú
aš3le
aš3lú
aš1m
a3špe
aš3pl
aš3pľ
aš3ťo
aš3ťuj
a1ťa
a1ťo
ať3p
aťpo4
a1ťu
a3ž2g
až4nú
ažrie3
a1ží
1ba
bab3r
bach3r
ba3dlo.
ba4fl
ba4g3r
ba4h3r
ba3kr
b3a4lovi
b3a4loví
3bam
bao2
ba3pr
b3are
ba4ren
bas3k
ba3sp
bas3t
ba1u4
ba1z2
ba4š3t
2b1b
2b1c
b1d
bdelo4
1b2e
4becno
4becné
4becný
be4d3r
be4hl
be4hn
b3erl
3bes
bes3k
bes3t
be2v1
be4z1
bez3d
bez3n
bezo4
bezú4
beš1
b1h2
1bi
bib1
bi4kr
biliar3
biliard4
3bio1
biot4
bis3tr
bit3r
bi4ši
b1j
2b1k
b3lic
b3lie
b3lis
1blk
b3lon
b3los
b3lov
3bloč
b3loň
bly2
4blá.
4blác
4blám
2b1m
2b1n
4bne.
bno3p
1bo
bod3r
bo3du
bod4ujm
bod4ujt
4boh4n
bo4hr
bo4h3v
boja3s4
bojpoh4
bo1k
bom3k
4b3omkn
4bo1p2
bop4n
bo4pr
bos3l
bos3t
bos4tk
bo4tm
bo2u
bo3vs
bo4vz
bo3z4m
b3ozn
4bozná
bo3zr
bo3z4v
bo4š3l
b1p
b3rac
b4raný
b3ratu
b4ratá
4braz
bre4chl
b3ren
bre4s
b3ret
b3ric
b3rik
b3ril
b3rim
b3ris
b3rit
bri4tv
b3rič
b3riš
b3riť
brk3l
1b2rm
1brn
4bro.
4bror
b3ros
bro3s4l
4brot
b3rou
b3rov
4brovo
b3roš
1brt
b3ruj
4b3rum
1brv
b3rác
b3rák
b3rám
b3ráv
b3ráč
2b1ré
2b1rí
1b4rô
b3rúc
b3rým
1brň
2b1s2
2b3t2
b4tnú.
1bu
3buk
bu3le
bu1m
bu1t
bu3v
bu3ze
bu3ľa
bu1ť
b1v
by2c
by4dl
by2s1
bz2
b1zd
b1zo
b1zr
b3zuj
b1zv
1bá
1bä
1bé
1bí
bí4de
b4ísk
4bísť
1bó
1bô
1bú
3búk
bú4km
1bý
2b1č
b2čm
b1ď
b3ľam
b1ľú
2bň
1bŕ
b1š2
b1ť
b1ž
1ca
cab3r
ca3dlo.
cap3r
c1b
4c1c
c1d2
1ce
ce1d
ce4dn
ce4p3r
ces4c
ce2u
ceu3ti
ce4z3
c2g
c2h
1cha
4chanj
cha3p
ch4cie
1che
1chi
4ch3lia
4ch3lin
ch3lú
4chmi
ch3n
4chne.
4chnu
4chnú.
4chnúť
1cho
chos3
cho4v3r
ch3raj
ch3ral
ch3rač
ch3rať
ch3reš
3chrn
ch3rát
ch3ráv
ch3ráš
3chrň
4cht
1chu
3chy.
3chyn
3chyň
3chá
1ché
1chí
3chú
3chýc
3chým
3chýň
2chč
ch2ň
2chť
1ci
3cia
ci4ac
ci3ami
ci3a4ri
ci4ent.
cie4s
3cii
ci4kd
ci4k3l
ci3k4n
ci3k4t
3cio.
3cioná
3ciou
ci4pr
ci3sl
ci3s4p
cit3r
3ciu
ci3z4b
ci3zl
c1j
2c1k2
2c1la
1clá
c2m
2cme
4cmi.
c1n
1co
co1c
co4fl
co4gn
co4se
co2u
c2pa
c1pä
c1ra
c1ro
cry2
c1s
2c1t
c2te
3cten
4cti.
ct4r
ctri3
1cu
cum1
1cv
c3ved
2cvu
2cvy
2c1vý1
1cy
cy2k1
cy2p1
cy2s
c1z2
1cá
1cé
1cí
1cô
1cú
c1č
c1ľ
1cŕ
c1š
c1ť
1da
4d4abr
da1c
4d3ada
da4dam
da3dlo.
da4g3r
dat3l
dat3r
4daň
d1b
3dbá.
d1c
dch4
d3d2
1de
debak3
de4bl
deb3lo
de4b3r
de1d
de4dm
de4fr
4d3ejd
dek3l
dek3r
dek4t
de4kv
delo3
4deov
de4p3r
des3k
des3p
des3t
det3r
de2u
d3evní
2d1ex
deza4
deš3p
deš3t
de4žm
dgu1
d1h2
1d2i
di4os
dip1
dis3k
dis3p
dis4tiev
4d3izb
di2š1
4d3iši
4d3išl
d1j
2d1k4
dko3str
4dla.
d3lac
d3laj
d3lak
d3lal
d3lam
d3lan
d3lať
d1le
1d4lh
d1li
1dlm
1dln
d1lo
1dlt
4dlá.
4d3lác
4d3lám
d3lár
d3lát
d3láš
d1lú
d1lý
1dlň
d1m
d4manil.
d4manila
dmis3
d1n
dna4učm
dna4učt
2dne
4dne.
dne4tm
dne4š3
3d4nin
d3no
dno3p
dno3sm
dno3sta
dno3str
2dnú
1d2o
do4bed
dob4lo
dob4ral
dob4rať
do4bre
do3b4ráč
d4obrý
do1c
do3d4
dog4n
doh4
do1k
4d3o4ke
do4lok
domk4
4do3mkn
do3ml
do3m4r
d4ona
d4oni
d4ono
do3p4l
do3pä
do3s4c
do3sk
do4sku
do4sky
do3sl
dos4lu
do3sm
do3s4n
do3sp
do3sta
do3stá
do4sť
dot4
dou4
d4ovať
4dovz
do1z2
doá2
do3čm
do4čme
do1š2
doš4tí
do4šv
do1ž2
d3p2
d3raa
d3rad
dra4sl
d3rat
d3rau
d3raz
d3raď
1drc
dre4pl
d3reč
dr4gl
drg3n
dr4g3ľ
dri4b
3driemk
d3rin
d3riť
1drk
1drl
1d4rm
1drn
3d4robno
4drobnom
droe4
d3rog4
d3rok
d3ros
dro4st
d3roz
d3rub
3druhý
d3ruč
d3ruš
1drv
d1ry
d3rál
3d4rážd
d3rém
drís3
d3rít
d3ríš
d3rúb
d1rý
3držn
2d1s4
dsk2
3dskn
d3t2
3d4tina.
1dto
dtu3c
du1c
1duj
d3u4ja
1duk
3dul
du2m
1dun
d3urč
d3utv
du3tí
1duí
3duč.
4d3u4če
1duľ
du3ľa
3duše
dv2
d1va
d1ve
dve3s4
d3vie
d1vl
d3vol
d3voľ
d1vr
d1vt
d1vy
d1vá
d1vä
d3vín
d1vý
d3vč
d1vŕ
dy4chl
dy2p1
dy4s1
1dyš
1dz
2dzb
2dzd
2dzg
dz2i
dzi3h4
dzi3s
2dzk
2dzm
d3zmy
2dzn
d3z4na
d4zno
d4zní
3d2z4o
4dzrkadľ
2dzt
2dzv
d2zô
2dzň
1dá
1dé
1dí
2d1í2d
4d3ísť
1dôb
dô1s2
1dú
d3úč
dú4či
1dý
d1č
d4činám
d2čm
d1ď
1dě
d1ľa
2d3ňa
1dŕ
d1š4
d4š3tený
d1ť
d2ž
3dža
dž2b
3dže
2džg
2džm
d3žr
2džt
1džu
1dží
e1a
eak3l
eak3r
eap3l
eap3r
eat3r
eautok3
eaš1
e1b
eb2d
eb3lom
eb3lác
eb3lám
eb3ram
ebrej4kl
eb3ria
ebrin4kl
ebrn4kl
ebryz4gl
ecen4gl
e3chy
e3chô
ecin4kl
e1c4l
ecmuľ4kl
ecur4gl
ecven4gl
ecvrn4gl
ecvrn4kl
e3d4chn
ede4ľ
ed3eľu
e3di
edi4z
ed3izi
e4dli
ed3lí
e3dlž
edo1
edoch4
edo4chla
e4d3o4hi
edo4hnil
edop4
edo4pla.
edo4pli.
edo4plo
edo4pne.
edo4pnú.
edo4pnúť
edo4schl
edos4l
edo4snil
edo4sní.
edos4p
edos4t
edo4tkla
edo4tklo
edo4učm
edo4učt
edoz4
edo4znej
edo3č4
edo4žne.
edo4žnú.
e3dra
ed4rad
edrap4sl
e3driek
edrn4kl
edruz4gl
e3drž
e3duc
ed4ujm
ed4ujt
e3dup
e1dy
edz4
ed3z3n
ed3zv
edú4r
e1dĺ
e2d1ľ
ed3ži
e1e
ee1d
ee2h1
ee2u
eflin4gl
eflin4kl
ef1n
e4f3rit
efrn4gl
efrn4kl
ef2ľ
ef2ň
egis3
e2g1n
egraj4fl
e4g3rov
e1h
eh3lí
eh3ne
e3ho
eh4ra
e2h3t
e1i
eih1
ei3sk
eit3r
e3jo
e3jú
e2kd
e1ke
e1ki
ekik4sl
ek3lám
ek3lý
ek3ré
4e2kt
4ekv
e3kva
ek3ve
ek3vie
ek3viz
e3kvá
e1ky
e1ké
e1kú
4e1ký
e1kĺ
e3kľ
e4kľú
ek2ň
e1kŕ
e1l
elo3str
el1s2
el4tm
e1ma
e1me
emi3t4
em3p
emrn4kl
em3rá
e1mu
em3u4h
e1my
e1má
e1mä
e1mú
e1mý
e1mŕ
enad4chl
enad4usm
enad4ust
ena4hne.
ena4hnil
ena4hnú.
ena4hnúť
ena3m
ena4pla.
ena4pli.
ena4plo
ena4pne.
ena4pnú.
ena4pnúť
ena4snuť
ena3u4
ena4učm
ena4učt
enač4n
ena3čne
ena4čne.
ena4žne.
ena4žnú.
e1ne
ene4b
ene4sc
e3no
eno3p
4entm
4entom
e3nu
ená4st
e3ní
en3čk
en4šm
e1o
eo4berať
eo4berá
eob4hnil
eoboh3r
eob4ozna
eob4rús
eob3z
eo4bý
eo4cho
eo3chra
eoch3v
eo4cit
eodfoto4
eo4die
eodne4c
eo4dobe
eodo4k3
eo4dol
eo4d3opi
eo4dopr
eodo4prú
eodo4sl
eodo4s3p
eodos3t
eodo4š3
eod3r
eodsú4h3
eo3duč
eodvy4kl
eodz3b
eodz3d
eodz3n
eodz3v
eod4zá
eod4ú
eoe2
eo4fic
eo4f3ra
eo4f3ľ
eo4hl
eoh3li
eoh3luš
eo4hm
eo4h3n
eoh4nu
eo4hol
eo4hr
eoh3re
eoh3ri
eoh3rý
eo4hy
eok3l
eok4lam
eok3m
eok3r
eok4rídl
eo4káz
eom3l
eom3rá
eo4nes
eo4pad
eo4pak
eo4pis
eop3lač
eop3lať
eop3lec
eop3leť
eo4pod
eo4pot
eo4pr
eop3raž
eo4pus
eo4rie
eos3c
eos3laď
eos3lád
eos3m
eo4sob
eos3pi
eos3t
eo4sv
eo4tla
eo4t3lá
eo4tm
eo4to
eo4tr
eot3rav
eot3re
eot3ri
eot3rú
eo4tup
eo4t3v
eo4v3l
eo4vr
eoz3r
eoš3k
eoš4kl
eo4šm
eoš3p
eoš3ľ
eoš3ť
eo4živ
eož3r
e1p
ep4ch
ep3lik
ep3lý
e2pn
epod4erm
epod4ert
epod4esm
epod4upm
epod4upt
epod4urm
epod4urt
epod4usm
epod4ust
epod4učm
epod4učt
epok4
epo4mkl
epo4pchl
epo4schl
epo4učm
epo4čne.
epo4čnú.
epo4žne.
epo4žnú.
epre4mkl
eprie3
eprih4
epri4mkl
epri4učm
epri4učt
epum4pl
e1ra
er3b4
er1c
e1re
ere4bl
ere4b3r
ere4hl
ere4k3l
ere4k3r
ere4k3v
ere4p3r
ere4sp
ere4st
ereš3
e1ri
er3k2
3erkm
e2rm
e1ro
eroz4plo
er3p2
er1s2
er4tm
e1ru
eru4če
e1ry
e1rá
e1ré
e1rí
e1ró
e1rô
e1rú
e1rý
3erý.
er1š2
e4sce
es2f
es4kak
es3klom
e3s4kop
es4kup
es3ké
es3ký
es3lič
e3sln
es3lác
es2m
es3man
e3s4neh
es2p
es4pit
es4pr
es3tal
es3tanc
es3taní
esten4kl
es4tie
est4není
es3tnu
4e4s3ty
es4tý
esú3d
esús4
es1ľ
es4ťah
e1ta
eta3s
eten4kl
e4tke
e4tko
e4tku
et4kv
e4tky
et3lič
e4tlo
et4mi
e4tn
etok4
eto4v3r
et4ras
e3trn
et3roa
etrom4fl
et3rou
e4try
et3rác
et3rám
e4ts
e1tu
et3ve
et3vi
et3vu
et3ví
e1tá
e1tí
e1tú
e4tč
e1tĺ
e1tŕ
e1u
eu2b
eu2c
euch4vá
eu4chá
eufrn4gl
eufrn4kl
eu2h
euh4la
eu2i
eu2k
euk4rad
eu2l
eu2m
eu2n
eu4p
eup4la
eu4rá
eu2s
eus4chl
eus3k
eu2t
eut4kaj
eut4kal
eut4kať
eut4kát
eut4káš
eu4tá
eu4tí
e4utík
euvrz4gl
eu2z
euz4n
eu2č
eu2š
eu2ž
e1v
e3v4chá
e3vdy
e3ve
ev4nu
ev4ná
ev4nú
ev4pi
evrs3
evrz4gl
evy4cli.
evy4hnú.
evy4mkl
evyna4š
evy4pla.
evy4pli.
evy4pne.
evy4pnú.
evy4pnúť
evypr3s
evy4slo.
evy4tnú.
evy4žne.
evy4žnú.
evzo4pl
evý3s
evý4ska.
ev4še
e1y
e1z
eza4cnej
ezamk4
eza4pla.
eza4pli.
eza4plo.
eza4pne.
eza4pnú.
eza4pnúť
ezapr3s4
eza4schl
eza4snil
eza4sní.
eza4tkl
eza4tla.
eza4tli.
eza4tlo
eza4tmi.
eza4tnú.
eza4tnúť
eza4učm
eza4učt
eza4znej
ez4b
ez4da
ez4de
ezd4nom
ez4do
ez4dú
ezh3nil
ez4hod
e4zhov
ez4hrab
ez4hre
ez4hrn
e4zhu
e4zhŕ
e3z4ie
ez2j
ezjaj4kl
ezjoj4kl
ez4lu
ez4m
ez2n
ezneu4
ezo4bli.
ezo4blo
ezoh4na
ezo4mkl
ezo4pne.
ezo4pnú.
ezo4pnúť
ezo3pä
ezos4c
ezo4schl
ezo4s3tá
ezo4tli.
ezo4tmi.
ezo4škli
ezo3ž4
ez4re
4ezv
e1á
e1í1
eís2
e1ó
e1ú
eú4ra
eú2t
eú3tu
ečiv4kl
ečmaj4zl
